Illinois, session 104th, HB4502.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Toll Highway Act is amended by changing 5Section 19 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 10/19)  (from Ch. 121, par. 100-19)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-457)8    Sec. 19. Toll rates. The Authority shall fix and revise 9from time to time, tolls or charges or rates for the privilege 10of using each of the toll highways constructed pursuant to 11this Act. Such tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted at rates 12calculated to provide the lowest reasonable toll rates that 13will provide funds sufficient with other revenues of the 14Authority to pay, (a) the cost of the construction of a toll 15highway authorized by joint resolution of the General Assembly 16pursuant to Section 14.1 and the reconstruction, major repairs 17or improvements of toll highways, (b) the cost of maintaining, 18repairing, regulating and operating the toll highways 19including only the necessary expenses of the Authority, and 20(c) the principal of all bonds, interest thereon and all 21sinking fund requirements and other requirements provided by 22resolutions authorizing the issuance of the bonds as they 23shall become due. In fixing the toll rates pursuant to this   HB4502- 2 -LRB104 18379 LNS 31821 b1Section 19 and Section 10(c) of this Act, the Authority shall 2take into account the effect of the provisions of this Section 319 permitting the use of the toll highway system without 4payment of the covenants of the Authority contained in the 5resolutions and trust indentures authorizing the issuance of 6bonds of the Authority. No such provision permitting the use 7of the toll highway system without payment of tolls after the 8date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall 9be applied in a manner that impairs the rights of bondholders 10pursuant to any resolution or trust indentures authorizing the 11issuance of bonds of the Authority. The use and disposition of 12any sinking or reserve fund shall be subject to such 13regulation as may be provided in the resolution or trust 14indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds. Subject to 15the provisions of any resolution or trust indenture 16authorizing the issuance of bonds any moneys in any such 17sinking fund in excess of an amount equal to one year's 18interest on the bonds then outstanding secured by such sinking 19fund may be applied to the purchase or redemption of bonds. All 20such bonds so redeemed or purchased shall forthwith be 21cancelled and shall not again be issued. No person shall be 22permitted to use any toll highway without paying the toll 23established under this Section except when on official Toll 24Highway Authority business which includes police and other 25emergency vehicles. However, any law enforcement agency 26vehicle, fire department vehicle, public or private ambulance   HB4502- 3 -LRB104 18379 LNS 31821 b1service vehicle engaged in the performance of an emergency 2service or duty that necessitates the use of the toll highway 3system, or other emergency vehicle that is plainly marked 4shall not be required to pay a toll to use a toll highway. A 5law enforcement, fire protection, or emergency services 6officer driving a law enforcement, fire protection, emergency 7services agency vehicle, or public or private ambulance 8service vehicle engaging in the performance of emergency 9services or duties that is not plainly marked must present an 10Official Permit Card which the law enforcement, fire 11protection, or emergency services officer receives from his or 12her law enforcement, fire protection, emergency services 13agency, or public or private ambulance service in order to use 14a toll highway without paying the toll. A law enforcement, 15fire protection, emergency services agency, or public or 16private ambulance service engaging in the performance of 17emergency services or duties must apply to the Authority to 18receive a permit, and the Authority shall adopt rules for the 19issuance of a permit, that allows public or private ambulance 20service vehicles engaged in the performance of emergency 21services or duties that necessitate the use of the toll 22highway system and all law enforcement, fire protection, or 23emergency services agency vehicles of the law enforcement, 24fire protection, or emergency services agency to use any toll 25highway without paying the toll established under this 26Section. The Authority shall maintain in its office a list of   HB4502- 4 -LRB104 18379 LNS 31821 b1all persons that are authorized to use any toll highway 2without charge when on official business of the Authority and 3such list shall be open to the public for inspection. In 4recognition of the unique role of public transportation in 5providing effective transportation in the Authority's service 6region, and to give effect to the exemption set forth in 7subsection (b) of Section 2.06 of the Regional Transportation 8Authority Act, the following vehicles may use any toll highway 9without paying the toll: (1) a vehicle owned or operated by the 10Suburban Bus Division of the Regional Transportation Authority 11that is being used to transport passengers for hire; and (2) 12any revenue vehicle that is owned or operated by a Mass Transit 13District created under Section 3 of the Local Mass Transit 14District Act and running regular scheduled service. 15    Among other matters, this amendatory Act of 1990 is 16intended to clarify and confirm the prior intent of the 17General Assembly to allow toll revenues from the toll highway 18system to be used to pay a portion of the cost of the 19construction of the North-South Toll Highway authorized by 20Senate Joint Resolution 122 of the 83rd General Assembly in 211984.22(Source: P.A. 100-739, eff. 1-1-19.) 23    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457)24    Sec. 19. Toll rates. The Authority shall fix and revise 25from time to time, tolls or charges or rates for the privilege   HB4502- 5 -LRB104 18379 LNS 31821 b1of using each of the toll highways constructed pursuant to 2this Act. Such tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted at rates 3calculated to provide the lowest reasonable toll rates that 4will provide funds sufficient with other revenues of the 5Authority to pay, (a) the cost of the construction of a toll 6highway authorized by joint resolution of the General Assembly 7pursuant to Section 14.1 and the reconstruction, major repairs 8or improvements of toll highways, (b) the cost of maintaining, 9repairing, regulating and operating the toll highways 10including only the necessary expenses of the Authority, and 11(c) the principal of all bonds, interest thereon and all 12sinking fund requirements and other requirements provided by 13resolutions authorizing the issuance of the bonds as they 14shall become due. In fixing the toll rates pursuant to this 15Section 19 and Section 10(c) of this Act, the Authority shall 16take into account the effect of the provisions of this Section 1719 permitting the use of the toll highway system without 18payment of the covenants of the Authority contained in the 19resolutions and trust indentures authorizing the issuance of 20bonds of the Authority. No such provision permitting the use 21of the toll highway system without payment of tolls after the 22date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall 23be applied in a manner that impairs the rights of bondholders 24pursuant to any resolution or trust indentures authorizing the 25issuance of bonds of the Authority. The use and disposition of 26any sinking or reserve fund shall be subject to such   HB4502- 6 -LRB104 18379 LNS 31821 b1regulation as may be provided in the resolution or trust 2indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds. Subject to 3the provisions of any resolution or trust indenture 4authorizing the issuance of bonds any moneys in any such 5sinking fund in excess of an amount equal to one year's 6interest on the bonds then outstanding secured by such sinking 7fund may be applied to the purchase or redemption of bonds. All 8such bonds so redeemed or purchased shall forthwith be 9cancelled and shall not again be issued. No person shall be 10permitted to use any toll highway without paying the toll 11established under this Section except when on official Toll 12Highway Authority business which includes police and other 13emergency vehicles. However, any law enforcement agency 14vehicle, fire department vehicle, public or private ambulance 15service vehicle engaged in the performance of an emergency 16service or duty that necessitates the use of the toll highway 17system, or other emergency vehicle that is plainly marked 18shall not be required to pay a toll to use a toll highway. A 19law enforcement, fire protection, or emergency services 20officer driving a law enforcement, fire protection, emergency 21services agency vehicle, or public or private ambulance 22service vehicle engaging in the performance of emergency 23services or duties that is not plainly marked must present an 24Official Permit Card which the law enforcement, fire 25protection, or emergency services officer receives from his or 26her law enforcement, fire protection, emergency services   HB4502- 7 -LRB104 18379 LNS 31821 b1agency, or public or private ambulance service in order to use 2a toll highway without paying the toll. A law enforcement, 3fire protection, emergency services agency, or public or 4private ambulance service engaging in the performance of 5emergency services or duties must apply to the Authority to 6receive a permit, and the Authority shall adopt rules for the 7issuance of a permit, that allows public or private ambulance 8service vehicles engaged in the performance of emergency 9services or duties that necessitate the use of the toll 10highway system and all law enforcement, fire protection, or 11emergency services agency vehicles of the law enforcement, 12fire protection, or emergency services agency to use any toll 13highway without paying the toll established under this 14Section. A veteran who is traveling to or from a medical 15appointment may use a toll highway without paying the toll if 16the veteran has applied for and received from the Authority an 17Official Permit Card. The Authority shall adopt rules for the 18issuance of a permit that allows a veteran to use any toll 19highway without paying the toll established under this Section 20while traveling to a medical appointment. The Authority shall 21maintain in its office a list of all persons that are 22authorized to use any toll highway without charge when on 23official business of the Authority and such list shall be open 24to the public for inspection. In recognition of the unique 25role of public transportation in providing effective 26transportation in the Authority's service region, and to give   HB4502- 8 -LRB104 18379 LNS 31821 b1effect to the exemption set forth in subsection (b) of Section 22.06 of the Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, the 3following vehicles may use any toll highway without paying the 4toll: (1) a vehicle owned or operated by the Suburban Bus 5Division of the Northern Illinois Transit Authority that is 6being used to transport passengers for hire; and (2) any 7revenue vehicle that is owned or operated by a Mass Transit 8District created under Section 3 of the Local Mass Transit 9District Act and running regular scheduled service. 10    Among other matters, this amendatory Act of 1990 is 11intended to clarify and confirm the prior intent of the 12General Assembly to allow toll revenues from the toll highway 13system to be used to pay a portion of the cost of the 14construction of the North-South Toll Highway authorized by 15Senate Joint Resolution 122 of the 83rd General Assembly in 161984.17    As used in this Section, "veteran" means an individual who 18served in the Armed Forces of the United States, the National 19Guard, or the reserves of the Armed Forces of the United 20States. 21(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 22    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 23changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 24that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 25represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does   HB4502- 9 -LRB104 18379 LNS 31821 b1not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 2made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 3Public Act.